src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-SG_FRONT
  +Sg+Gen:%>ӹн   K ; !
  +Sg+Acc:%>ӹм   K ; !
  +Sg+Com:%>ге   K ; ! (with a village)
  +Sg+Dat:%>лӓн  K ; !
  +Sg+Ine:%>ӹштӹ K ; ! (in a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>ӹшкӹ K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>ӹш   K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Lat:%>еш   K ; ! (into a village)
 +Sg+Cmpr:%>лӓ   K ; ! (like a village)
  +Sg+Abe:%>де   K ; ! (without a village)

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL
!!
  +Pl+Nom:%>влӓ    K ;
  +Pl+Gen:%>влӓн   K ; !
  +Pl+Acc:%>влӓм   K ; !
  +Pl+Com:%>влӓге  K ; ! (with a village)
  +Pl+Dat:%>влӓлӓн K ; !
  +Pl+Ine:%>влӓштӹ K ; ! (in a village)
  +Pl+Ill:%>влӓшкӹ K ; ! (to a village)
  +Pl+Ill:%>влӓш   K ; ! (to a village)
  +Pl+Lat:%>влӓэш  K ; ! (into a village)
 +Pl+Cmpr:%>влӓлӓ  K ; ! (like a village)
  +Pl+Abe:%>влӓде  K ; ! (without a village)



LEXICON N_01
  +Sg+Gen:%>%{ыӹØ%}н            K ; !
  +Sg+Acc:%>%{ыӹØ%}м            K ; !
  +Sg+Com:%>ге                  K ; ! (with a village)
  +Sg+Dat:%>л%{аӓ%}н            K ; !
  +Sg+Ine:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}    K ; ! (in a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>%{ыӹØ%}шк%{ыӹØ%}    K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Ill:%>%{ыӹØ%}ш            K ; ! (to a village)
  +Sg+Lat:%>еш                  K ; ! (into a village)
 +Sg+Cmpr:%>л%{аӓ%}             K ; ! (like a village)
  +Sg+Abe:%>де                  K ; ! (without a village)
!!
  +Pl+Nom:влӓ                   K ;
  +Pl+Gen:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}н         K ; !
  +Pl+Acc:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}м         K ; !
  +Pl+Com:влӓ%>ге               K ; ! (with a village)
  +Pl+Dat:влӓ%>л%{аӓ%}н         K ; !
  +Pl+Ine:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%} K ; ! (in a village)
  +Pl+Ill:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}шк%{ыӹØ%} K ; ! (to a village)
  +Pl+Ill:влӓ%>%{ыӹØ%}ш         K ; ! (to a village)
  +Pl+Lat:влӓ%>Е2ш              K ; ! (into a village)
 +Pl+Cmpr:влӓ%>л%{аӓ%}          K ; ! (like a village)
  +Pl+Abe:влӓ%>де               K ; ! (without a village)

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_BACK
!! PxSg1+NB+CASE
!! singular possessa
!!

!!
!     кол+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: [колем, колэм] # х2 колэмжӹ

!!PxSg1
  SG-ABE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ACC-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-COM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG1_MUTUAL ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG1_BACK   ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG1_BACK    ;
  SG-GEN-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-INE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG1_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXSG1_BACK    ;
  SG-LAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-NOM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
!!PxSg2
  SG-ABE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ACC-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-COM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG2_MUTUAL ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG2_BACK   ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-GEN-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-INE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG2_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXSG2_BACK    ;
  SG-LAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-NOM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
!!PxSg3
  SG-ABE-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-ACC-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-COM-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG3_BACK   ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-GEN-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-LAT-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  SG-NOM-PXSG3_BACK    ;
!!PxPl1
  PXPL1-SG-ABE         ;
  PXPL1-SG-ACC         ;
  PXPL1-SG-COM         ;
  PXPL1-SG-CMPR        ;
  PXPL1-SG-DAT         ;
  PXPL1-SG-GEN         ;
  SG-ILL-PXPL1_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXPL1_BACK    ;
  PXPL1-SG-LAT         ;
  PXPL1-SG-NOM         ;
!!PxPl2
  PXPL2-SG-ABE         ;
  PXPL2-SG-ACC         ;
  PXPL2-SG-COM         ;
  PXPL2-SG-CMPR        ;
  PXPL2-SG-DAT         ;
  PXPL2-SG-GEN         ;
  SG-ILL-PXPL2_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXPL2_BACK    ;
  PXPL2-SG-LAT         ;
  SG-NOM-PXPL2         ;
!!PxPl3
  SG-ABE-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-ACC-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-COM-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-CMPR-PXPL3_BACK   ;
  SG-DAT-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-GEN-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-ILL-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-INE-PXPL3_BACK    ;
  SG-LAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-NOM-PXPL3_BACK    ;

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-SG_FRONT
!! PxSg1+NB+CASE
!! singular possessa
!!

!!
!     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: [колем, колэм] # х2 колэмжӹ

!!PxSg1
  SG-ABE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ACC-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-COM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG1_MUTUAL ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG1_FRONT  ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG1_FRONT   ;
  SG-GEN-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-INE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG1_FRONT   ;
  SG-INE-PXSG1_FRONT   ;
  SG-LAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-NOM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
!!PxSg2
  SG-ABE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ACC-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-COM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG2_MUTUAL ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG2_FRONT  ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-GEN-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-INE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG2_FRONT   ;
  SG-INE-PXSG2_FRONT   ;
  SG-LAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-NOM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
!!PxSg3
  SG-ABE-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  SG-ACC-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  SG-COM-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  SG-CMPR-PXSG3_FRONT  ;
  SG-DAT-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  SG-GEN-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  SG-ILL-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  SG-INE-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  SG-LAT-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  SG-NOM-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
!!PxPl1
  PXPL1-SG-ABE         ;
  PXPL1-SG-ACC         ;
  PXPL1-SG-COM         ;
  PXPL1-SG-CMPR        ;
  PXPL1-SG-DAT         ;
  PXPL1-SG-GEN         ;
  SG-ILL-PXPL1_FRONT   ;
  SG-INE-PXPL1_FRONT   ;
  PXPL1-SG-LAT         ;
  PXPL1-SG-NOM         ;
!!PxPl2
  PXPL2-SG-ABE         ;
  PXPL2-SG-ACC         ;
  PXPL2-SG-COM         ;
  PXPL2-SG-CMPR        ;
  PXPL2-SG-DAT         ;
  PXPL2-SG-GEN         ;
  SG-ILL-PXPL2_FRONT   ;
  SG-INE-PXPL2_FRONT   ;
  PXPL2-SG-LAT         ;
  SG-NOM-PXPL2         ;
!!PxPl3
  SG-ABE-PXPL3_FRONT   ;
  SG-ACC-PXPL3_FRONT   ;
  SG-COM-PXPL3_FRONT   ;
  SG-CMPR-PXPL3_FRONT  ;
  SG-DAT-PXPL3_FRONT   ;
  SG-GEN-PXPL3_FRONT   ;
  SG-ILL-PXPL3_FRONT   ;
  SG-INE-PXPL3_FRONT   ;
  SG-LAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  SG-NOM-PXPL3_FRONT   ;

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_BACK
! plural possessa

!!PxSg1
  PL-ABE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXSG1_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;

!!PxSg2
  PL-ABE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXSG2_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;

!!PxSg3
  PL-ABE-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXSG3_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ABE-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  PL-ACC-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  PL-COM-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  PL-CMPR-PXSG3_BACK   ;
  PL-DAT-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  PL-GEN-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  PL-ILL-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  PL-INE-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  PL-LAT-PXSG3_BACK    ;
  PL-NOM-PXSG3_BACK    ;

!!PxPl1
  PL-ABE-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXPL1_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;

!!PxPl2
  PL-ABE-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXPL2_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;

!!PxPl3
  PL-ABE-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXPL3_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;

LEXICON NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA-PL_FRONT
! plural possessa

!!PxSg1
  PL-ABE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXSG1_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXSG1_MUTUAL  ;

!!PxSg2
  PL-ABE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXSG2_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXSG2_MUTUAL  ;

!!PxSg3
  PL-ABE-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXSG3_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXSG3_MUTUAL  ;

  PL-ABE-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  PL-ACC-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  PL-COM-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  PL-CMPR-PXSG3_FRONT  ;
  PL-DAT-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  PL-GEN-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  PL-ILL-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  PL-INE-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  PL-LAT-PXSG3_FRONT   ;
  PL-NOM-PXSG3_FRONT   ;

!!PxPl1
  PL-ABE-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXPL1_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXPL1_MUTUAL  ;

!!PxPl2
  PL-ABE-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXPL2_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXPL2_MUTUAL  ;

!!PxPl3
  PL-ABE-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ACC-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-COM-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-CMPR-PXPL3_MUTUAL ;
  PL-DAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-GEN-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-ILL-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-INE-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-LAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;
  PL-NOM-PXPL3_MUTUAL  ;


!!
LEXICON SG-ABE-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/CP:%>деэм K ; !NB_CX_PX
 +Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/PC:%>емде K ; !NB_PX_CX

LEXICON SG-ACC-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Acc+PxSg1+So/PC:%>емӹм K ;

LEXICON SG-COM-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Com+PxSg1+So/PC:%>емге K ;

LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC:%>емлӓ K ; !NB_PX_CX
LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXSG1_BACK
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ла%>эм K ;
LEXICON SG-CMPR-PXSG1_FRONT
 +Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/CP:%>лӓ%>эм K ;

LEXICON SG-DAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC:%>емлӓн K ;
LEXICON SG-DAT-PXSG1_BACK
 +Sg+Dat+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ланем K ;
LEXICON SG-DAT-PXSG1_FRONT
 +Sg+Dat+PxSg1+So/CP:%>лӓнем K ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC:%>емӹн K ;

LEXICON SG-ILL-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg1+So/PC:%>емӹшкӹ K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXSG1_BACK
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ышкем K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXSG1_FRONT
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ӹшкем K ;

LEXICON SG-INE-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/PC:%>емӹштӹ K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXSG1_BACK
 +Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ыштем K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXSG1_FRONT
 +Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ӹштем K ;

LEXICON SG-LAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Lat+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ешем K ; !NB_CX_PX
 +Sg+Lat+PxSg1+So/PC:%>емӹш K ; !NB_PX_CX

LEXICON SG-NOM-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ем K ;

!+!
LEXICON PL-ABE-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/NPC:%>влӓэмде K ;
 +Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓде K ;

LEXICON PL-ACC-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Acc+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓм  K ;
 +Pl+Acc+PxSg1+So/NPC:%>влӓэмӹм K ;

LEXICON PL-COM-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓге K ;
 +Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/NPC:%>влӓэмге K ;

LEXICON PL-CMPR-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NPC:%>влӓэмлӓ K ;
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NCP:%>влӓлӓэм K ;
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓлӓ K ;

LEXICON PL-DAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL
  +Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NPC:%>влӓэмлӓн K ;
  +Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓлӓн K ;
  +Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NCP:%>влӓлӓнем K ;
! +Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓлӓ  K ; !!= * __@CODE@__ Is this really supposed to be here

LEXICON PL-GEN-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Gen+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓн  K ;
 +Pl+Gen+PxSg1+So/NPC:%>влӓэмӹн K ;

LEXICON PL-ILL-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/NCP:%>влӓшкем  K ;
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓшкӹ K ;
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓш   K ;
 +Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/NCP:%>влӓшкем  K ;

LEXICON PL-INE-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/NCP:%>влӓштем  K ;
 +Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓштӹ K ;

LEXICON PL-LAT-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/NCP:%>влӓэшем K ;
 +Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓэш K ;
 +Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓш  K ;

LEXICON PL-NOM-PXSG1_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NCP:%>влӓэм K ;
 +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC:%>емвлӓ K ;

!!
LEXICON SG-ABE-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Abe+PxSg2+So/CP:%>деэт K ;
 +Sg+Abe+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етде K ;

LEXICON SG-ACC-PXSG2_MUTUAL
 +Sg+Acc+PxSg2+So/PC:%>етӹм K ;
